California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) Accept any gifts, donations, or bequests from individuals, corporations, or organizations, or accept grants of funds from private or public agencies. A gift of personal property otherwise required to be approved by the Director of Finance pursuant to Section 11005 of the Government Code is deemed approved, unless it is disapproved within 60 days of receipt of a request from the executive director of the conservancy to approve the gift. A gift of real property shall be submitted by the executive director to the Department of General Services for its review. The Department of General Services shall complete its review within 30 days of receipt of a completed request and shall transmit the request for approval to the Director of Finance within that period. Unless the gift of real property is disapproved by the Director of Finance within 30 days of its receipt of the request, the gift is deemed approved pursuant to Section 11005 of the Government Code.

(b) Contract for professional services required by the conservancy or for the performance of work and services which in its opinion cannot satisfactorily be performed by its officers and employees or by other federal, state, or local governmental agencies.

(c) Do any and all other things necessary to carry out the purposes of this division.

(d) Sue and be sued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1280, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

33211.5.

(a) The following conditions of use apply to property owned or subject to the management of the conservancy:

(1) Opening and closing hours shall be posted on any property upon which public use is permitted.

(2) Property may be closed to public use only when fire, mudslide, landslide, or flood dangers pose a substantial risk of injury or loss of life, or when a federal, state, or local disaster or emergency declaration has been made by an authorized person or public agency, or where there is an emergency or potential emergency situation of a temporary nature that involves substantial risk or potential risk to life or property, and the temporary closure or restriction of access is necessary to protect the public health and safety.

Any property closed shall be reopened as soon as the fire, mudslide, landslide, or flood dangers no longer pose a danger of injury or loss of life, or when a federal, state, or local disaster or emergency declaration is no longer in effect, or where there is no longer an emergency or potential emergency situation of a temporary nature that involves substantial risk or potential risk to life or property.

(3) Vehicles shall park only in designated areas and may not be operated off of roads or other areas designated for vehicle use. All vehicle use, including bicycles, shall conform to posted signs.

(b) Trails, campsites, and other public use areas on property owned or subject to the management of the conservancy shall be designated and posted with prohibited activities and use restrictions clearly indicated, including, but not limited to, the prohibition or restriction of smoking, fires, fireworks, animals, possession of dangerous weapons, or other activities that affect the safety of visitors, campers, trail users, or the natural or historic resources of the property.

(c) Determining and posting conditions of use pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) may not be considered the adoption of regulations within the meaning of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(d) (1) The conditions of use and types of uses of property owned or subject to the management of the conservancy are considered to be of statewide significance. The types of uses and the management policies affecting those uses shall be consistent with the policies for permitted uses of lands within the state park system.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, ordinance, rule, or regulation, the conservancy may exercise its discretion in determining whether to authorize any license, permit for special use, easement, project, activity, or other entitlement to be undertaken by the conservancy or its agents, for the use of conservancy owned or managed land. This subdivision shall not be construed to restrict the authority of the conservancy to lease lands consistent with the purposes of this division and the requirements of Section 33206.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 595, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

33211.6.

(a) Dumping any refuse matter, except by permit signed by the executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative, on property owned or managed by the conservancy, and posted against that dumping, shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Injuring, defacing, or destroying any property owned or managed by the conservancy or any of the natural features thereof, shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), or
 imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) Violation of the posted conditions of use on any property owned or managed by the conservancy is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding 90 days, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and
 imprisonment, except that at the time a particular action pursuant to this section is commenced, the judge may, considering the recommendation of the prosecuting attorney, reduce the charged offense from a misdemeanor to an infraction. A person convicted of the offense after a reduction shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than
 five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 536, Sec. 1.   (AB 1767)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

33212.

(a) The executive director of the conservancy shall be exempt from civil service and shall be appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the conservancy. The executive director serving on the effective date of the amendments to this section enacted at the 1981–82 Regular Session of the Legislature shall continue to serve until an appointment is made by the conservancy.

(b) The executive director shall administer the affairs of the conservancy, employ staff, be responsible to the conservancy for program performance, and shall be considered the head of a department within the meaning of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11150) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the status and employment of any employee shall not be affected by the appointment of a successor executive director as provided in subdivision (a) until the State Personnel Board has acted under this subdivision. The State Personnel Board shall endeavor to establish such classes of state service as may in its judgment be necessary to ensure that the provisions of this section do not disrupt the essential functions of the conservancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1304, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

33213.

(a) The Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy Advisory Committee is hereby created. The advisory committee consists of 26 members, as follows:

(1) Fifteen representatives of local governments from jurisdictions including the Santa Monica Mountains, one of whom shall be appointed by the Mayor of the City of Los Angeles, one of whom shall be appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles, one of whom shall be appointed by the City Council of the City of Thousand Oaks, one of whom shall be appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Ventura, one of whom shall be appointed by the City Council of the City of Agoura Hills, one of whom shall be appointed by the City Council of the City of Westlake Village, one of whom shall be appointed by the City Council of the City of Malibu, one of whom shall be appointed by the City Council of the City of Calabasas, one of whom shall be appointed by the City Council of Burbank, one of whom shall be appointed by the City Council of Glendale, one of whom shall be appointed by the City Council of La Canada-Flintridge, one of whom shall be appointed by the City Council of Pasadena, one of whom shall be appointed by the City Council of Sierra Madre, one of whom shall be appointed by the City Council of South Pasadena, and one of whom shall be appointed by the Board of Supervisors of Los Angeles County to represent the unincorporated communities within the jurisdiction of the East Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor, after consultation with the Town Council of Altadena and the Crescenta Valley Town Council.

(2) Six public members, two of whom shall be appointed by the Governor, two of whom shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and two of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly. 

(3) One representative of the Rancho Simi Recreation and Park District, to be appointed by the district board of directors. 

(4) One representative of the Conejo Recreation and Park District, to be appointed by the district board of directors. 

(5) One representative of the Pleasant Valley Recreation and Park District, to be appointed by the district board of directors. 

(6) One representative of the City of Santa Clarita, to be appointed by the city council. 

(7) One representative of the City of Moorpark, to be appointed by the city council.

(b) The appointing powers shall make every effort to ensure that the ethnic and racial composition of the advisory committee reflects the racial and ethnic composition of the population of the state.

(c) The advisory committee shall select from among its members a chairperson and a vice chairperson.

(d) The members of the advisory committee shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. 

(e) The advisory committee has the following duties:

(1) Propose and review projects for conservancy action and report to the conservancy regarding the conformity of the projects with the plan.

(2) Review proposed amendments to the plan. 

(3) Provide opportunities for public participation. 

(f) Twelve members of the advisory committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business of the advisory committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 991, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

33214.

The conservancy and any city, county, or recreation and park district, in undertaking any project pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 33204, shall be subject to the provisions of Division 24 (commencing with Section 33000) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33215.

The Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy Fund is hereby established. Money deposited in the fund pursuant to Sections 33202, 33203, 33204, 33205, and 33206 shall be available for the purposes of this division, upon appropriation therefor by the Legislature. A separate federal grant account shall be established within the fund. Grants received pursuant to Section 507(n) of the National Parks and Recreation Act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 460kk(n)) shall be deposited in the separate federal grant account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1304, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Upper Los Angeles River and Tributaries Working Group [33220. - 33220.]

33220.

(a) There shall be within the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy an Upper Los Angeles River and Tributaries Working Group. The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, in consultation with the conservancy, and, to the extent that they wish to consult, the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors and the City of Los Angeles, shall consider requests from local agency representatives to participate in the working group and may appoint no more than 23 representatives to the working group. A representative appointed to the working group may designate an alternate in his or her place. The working group may include, but need not be limited to, representatives from the conservancy, the County of Los Angeles,
 the Cities of Burbank, Glendale,
 La Cañada Flintridge, Los Angeles, Pasadena, San Fernando, and South Pasadena, elected officials of the cities riparian to the Pacoima Wash and Tujunga Wash, and nonprofit organizations serving the Upper Los Angeles River, San Fernando Valley, Pacoima Wash, Tujunga Wash, and Verdugo Wash.

(b) On or before June 30, 2020,
 the working group shall develop, through watershed-based planning methods and community engagement, a revitalization plan for the Upper Los Angeles River, the tributaries of the Pacoima Wash, Tujunga Wash, and Verdugo Wash, the Arroyo Seco, and any additional tributary waterway that the working group determines to be necessary. The revitalization plan shall address the unique and diverse needs of the Upper Los Angeles River, Pacoima Wash, Tujunga Wash, Verdugo Wash, and Arroyo Seco, and the communities through which they pass. The plan shall be consistent with and enhance, and may be
 incorporated into plans that include, but are not limited to, the County of Los Angeles’ Master Plan. The plan shall include watershed education programs that help the Upper Los Angeles River, Pacoima Wash, Tujunga Wash, Verdugo Wash, and Arroyo Seco communities recognize the value of the waterways and the importance of protecting the river’s watershed resources and its vitality to their communities. The revitalization plan shall require a master planning process that includes community engagement and a prioritization of disadvantaged communities, identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The conservancy shall provide any necessary staffing to the working group to assist in the development of the plan.

(d) The
 development and implementation of the revitalization plan may be eligible for funding from any public or private source, including, but not limited to, funding available pursuant to Section 79735 of the Water Code. Entities that are eligible to implement the revitalization plan include, but are not limited to, state agencies, local agencies, and nonprofit organizations, and may be eligible for state funding. An entity receiving funding to implement the revitalization plan shall submit progress reports to the conservancy that include the status of funding. 

(e) The working group shall submit the revitalization plan to the conservancy for approval. Upon adoption by the conservancy, the revitalization plan shall be considered an amendment to the Watershed and Open Space Plan for the San Gabriel and Los Angeles Rivers. To the extent that the city or county wishes to consider the revitalization plan, the conservancy shall
 submit the plan for adoption to the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors for inclusion in the Master Plan of the County of Los Angeles and to the Los Angeles City Council for inclusion into the Los Angeles River Revitalization Master Plan.

(f) No later than June 30, 2020, the conservancy shall submit a copy of the plan to the Assembly Committee on Water, Parks, and Wildlife and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 895, Sec. 1.   (SB 1126)   Effective September 28, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 23.3. SIERRA NEVADA CONSERVANCY [33300. - 33356.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [33300. - 33302.]

33300.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the Laird-Leslie Sierra Nevada Conservancy Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33301.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Sierra Nevada Region is a globally significant area, including many national and state parks, the highest peaks in the 48 contiguous states, and large, pristine areas that are open for public use.

(b) The Sierra Nevada Region is an important part of the state’s economy, providing substantial agricultural products, timber resources, ranching, mining, tourism, and recreation.

(c) The Sierra Nevada Region provides
 drinking water to 75 percent of Californians and nearly all of the water supply for western Nevada. As California’s principal watershed, the region is the critical source of water for urban and rural parts of northern and southern California.

(d) In cooperation with local governments, private businesses, nonprofit organizations, tribal organizations, federal agencies, other California state governmental entities, and the public, a Sierra Nevada Conservancy can help do all
 of the following:

(1) Provide increased opportunities for tourism and recreation.

(2) Protect, conserve, and restore the region’s physical, cultural, archaeological, historical, and living resources.

(3) Aid in the preservation of working landscapes.

(4) Reduce the risk of natural disasters, such as wildfires.

(5) Protect and improve water and air quality.

(6) Assist the regional economy through the operation of the conservancy’s program.

(7) Identify the highest priority projects and
 initiatives for which funding is needed.

(8) Undertake efforts to enhance public use and enjoyment of lands owned by the public.

(9) Support efforts that advance both environmental preservation and the economic well-being of Sierra residents in a complementary manner.

(10) Support efforts that advance climate resilience and equity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 70, Sec. 1.   (SB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

33302.

For purposes of this division, the following terms shall apply:

(a) “Board” means the Governing Board of the Sierra Nevada Conservancy.

(b) “Conservancy” means the Sierra Nevada Conservancy.

(c) “Fund” means the Sierra Nevada Conservancy Fund created pursuant to Section 33355.

(d) “Local public agency” means a city, county, district, or joint powers authority.

(e) “Nonprofit organization” means a private, nonprofit organization that qualifies for
 exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code, and whose charitable purposes are consistent with the purposes of the conservancy as set forth in this division.

(f) (1) “Region” or “Sierra Nevada Region” means the area lying within the Counties of Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, El Dorado, Fresno, Inyo, Kern, Lassen, Madera, Mariposa, Modoc, Mono, Nevada, Placer, Plumas, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Tehama, Trinity, Tulare, Tuolumne, and Yuba, described as the area bounded as follows:

(2) On the east by the eastern boundary of the State of California; the crest of the White/Inyo ranges; and State Routes 395 and 14 south of Olancha; on the south by State Route 58, Tehachapi Creek, and Caliente Creek; on the west by the line of 1,250
 feet above sea level from Caliente Creek to the Kern/Tulare County line; the lower level of the western slope’s blue oak woodland, from the Kern/Tulare County line to the Sacramento River near the mouth of Seven-Mile Creek north of Red Bluff; the Sacramento River from Seven-Mile Creek north to Cow Creek below Redding; Cow Creek, Little Cow Creek, Dry Creek, and up to the southern boundary of the Pit River watershed where Bear Creek Mountain Road and Dry Creek Road intersect; the southern boundary of the Pit River watershed; the western boundary of the upper Trinity watershed in the County of Trinity; on the north by the boundary of the upper Trinity watershed in the County of Trinity and the upper Sacramento, McCloud, and Pit River watersheds in the County of Siskiyou; and within the County of Modoc, the easterly boundary of the Klamath River watershed; and on the north in the County of Modoc by
 the northern boundary of the State of California; excluding both of the following:

(A) The Lake Tahoe Region, as described in Section 66905.5 of the Government Code, where it is defined as “region.”

(B) The San Joaquin River Parkway, as described in Section 32510.

(g) “Subregions” means the six subregions in which the Sierra Nevada Region is located, described as follows:

(1) The northwest Sierra subregion, comprising the Counties of Shasta, Siskiyou, Tehama, and Trinity.

(2) The northeast Sierra subregion, comprising the Counties of Lassen, Modoc, Plumas, and Sierra.

(3) The north central Sierra subregion, comprising the Counties of Butte, Nevada, Placer, and Yuba.

(4) The south central Sierra subregion, comprising the Counties of Amador, Calaveras, El Dorado, and Tuolumne.

(5) The southeast Sierra subregion, comprising the Counties of Alpine, Inyo, Kern, and Mono.

(6) The southwest Sierra subregion, comprising the Counties of Fresno, Madera, Mariposa, and Tulare. 

(h) “Tribal organization” means an Indian tribe, band, nation, or other organized group or community, or a tribal agency authorized by a tribe, which is one or both of the following:

(1) Recognized by the United States and identified within the most current Federal Register.

(2) Listed on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission as a California Native American tribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 70, Sec. 2.   (SB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Sierra Nevada Conservancy [33320. - 33333.]

33320.

There is in the Natural Resources Agency the Sierra Nevada Conservancy, which is created as a state agency to do all of the following, working in collaboration and cooperation with local governments and interested parties:

(a) Provide increased opportunities for tourism and recreation.

(b) Protect, conserve, and restore the region’s physical, cultural, archaeological, historical, and living resources.

(c) Aid in the preservation of working landscapes.

(d) Reduce the risk of natural disasters,
 such as wildfires.

(e) Protect and improve water and air quality.

(f) Assist the regional economy through the operation of the conservancy’s program.

(g) Identify the highest priority projects and initiatives for which funding is needed.

(h) Undertake efforts to enhance public use and enjoyment of lands owned by the public.

(i) Support efforts that advance both environmental preservation and the economic well-being of Sierra residents in a complementary manner.

(j) Support efforts that advance climate resilience and
 equity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 70, Sec. 3.   (SB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

33321.

(a) The board shall consist of 13 voting members and three nonvoting liaison advisers, appointed or designated as follows:

(1) The 13 voting members of the board shall consist of all of the following:

(A) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, or his or her designee.

(B) The Director of Finance, or his or her designee.

(C) Three public members appointed by the Governor, who are not elected officials, to represent statewide interests.

(D) One public member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, who is not an elected official, to represent statewide interests.

(E) One public member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, who is not an elected official, to represent statewide interests.

(F) One member for each of the six subregions who shall be a member of the board of supervisors of a county located within that subregion, and whose supervisorial district shall be at least partially contained within the Sierra Nevada Region. Each member shall be selected by the counties within that subregion, according to the following procedure:

(i) Each county board of supervisors within a subregion shall select a member of their board to
 determine, with the selected members of the other counties in the subregion, which member of a board of supervisors within the subregion shall be appointed as a member of the conservancy board. An alternate may be appointed. The appointed member and any alternate shall have at least part of his or her supervisorial district within the subregion.

(ii) The initial appointment of a member for each subregion shall be made no later than 60 days after the effective date of this division. A subsequent appointment to a regular term on the board shall be made before the date specified in Section 33322 for the commencement of that term. A vacancy occurring before the end of a term shall be filled for the remainder of the term within 60 days of the vacancy.

(iii) If the boards of
 supervisors of the subregion do not appoint a member to the board within the timeframe specified in clause (ii), the Governor shall appoint one of the supervisors selected in clause (i) to serve as the board member for the subregion.

(2) The three nonvoting liaison advisers who serve in an advisory, nonvoting capacity shall consist of all of the following:

(A) One representative of the National Park Service, designated by the United States Secretary of the Interior.

(B) One representative of the United States Forest Service, designated by the United States Secretary of Agriculture.

(C) One representative of the United States Bureau of Land Management, designated by the
 United States Secretary of the Interior.

(b) Appointing powers shall seek to include individuals from a breadth of backgrounds.

(c) Two members of the Senate, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and two members of the Assembly, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, shall meet with the conservancy and participate in its activities to the extent that such participation is not incompatible with their respective positions as Members of the Legislature. One appointee from each house of the Legislature shall represent a district either partially or wholly within the Sierra Nevada Conservancy boundary, as described in subdivision (f) of Section 33302, and one appointee from each house shall represent a district from outside the Sierra Nevada Conservancy boundary, as
 described in subdivision (f) of Section 33302.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 499, Sec. 2.   (AB 2849)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

33322.

Members and alternates, if any, shall serve terms as follows:

(a) The members appointed pursuant to subparagraphs (C) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 33321 shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing power.

(b) The members and alternates, if any, appointed under subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 33321 shall serve, as follows:

(1) Members and alternates in the northwest Sierra subregion, the north central Sierra subregion, and the southeast Sierra subregion shall have terms
 beginning on January 1 in an odd-numbered year and ending on December 31 of the following even-numbered year. All terms shall be for two years.

(2) Members and alternates in the northeast Sierra subregion, the south central Sierra subregion, and the southwest Sierra subregion shall have terms beginning on January 1 in an even-numbered year and ending on December 31 in the following odd-numbered year. Members and alternates who are initially appointed to the board shall serve for a one-year term for the first year. Subsequent terms shall be for two years.

(c) No member of the board, whose appointment to the board was contingent upon meeting a condition of eligibility under this division, shall serve beyond the time when the member ceases to meet that
 condition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 70, Sec. 4.   (SB 39)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

33323.

(a) The voting members appointed or designated under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 33321 who are not state employees shall be compensated for attending meetings of the conservancy at the rate of one hundred dollars ($100) per scheduled meeting day.

(b) All members of the board shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in attending meetings of the conservancy and carrying out the duties of their office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33324.

Annually, the voting members of the board shall elect from among the voting members a chairperson and vice-chairperson, and other officers as necessary. If the office of the chairperson or vice-chairperson becomes vacant, a new chairperson or vice-chairperson shall be elected by the voting members of the board to serve for the remainder of the term.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33325.

(a) Seven members of the voting members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the business of the conservancy. The board shall not transact the business of the conservancy if a quorum is not present at the time a vote is taken. A decision of the board requires an affirmative vote of seven of the voting members, and the vote is binding with respect to all matters acted on by the conservancy.

(b) The board shall adopt rules, regulations, and procedures for the conduct of business by the conservancy.

(c) The voting members of the board appointed or designated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 33321 and the nonvoting advisers selected pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 33321, shall have the right to attend all meetings of the board, including closed sessions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33326.

The board may establish advisory boards or committees, hold community meetings, and engage in public outreach using advanced forms of technology, in order to facilitate the decisionmaking process. Members of advisory boards or committees may be reimbursed for the actual and necessary expenses, including travel expenses, that they incur in attending regular meetings of the advisory board or committee of which they are a member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33327.

The board shall establish and maintain a headquarters office within the region. The conservancy may rent or own real and personal property and equipment pursuant to applicable statutes and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33328.

The board shall determine the qualifications of, and shall appoint, an executive officer of the conservancy, who shall be exempt from civil service. The board shall employ other staff as necessary to execute the powers and functions provided for under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33329.

The board may enter into contracts with private entities and public agencies to procure consulting and other services necessary to achieve the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33330.

The conservancy’s expenses for support and administration may be paid from the conservancy’s operating budget and any other funding sources available to the conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33331.

The board shall conduct business in accordance with the requirements of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33332.

The board shall hold its regular meetings within, or near, the region.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33333.

On or after January 1, 2006, the board shall post agendas for each board meeting on the Internet.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Powers, Duties, and Limitations [33340. - 33356.]

33340.

The conservancy’s jurisdiction is limited to the Sierra Nevada Region.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33341.

The conservancy shall carry out projects and activities to further the purposes of this division throughout the region. The board shall make every effort to ensure that, over time, conservancy funding and other efforts are spread equitably across each of the various subregions and among the stated goal areas, with adequate allowance for the variability of costs associated with individual regions and types of projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33342.

In carrying out this division, the conservancy shall cooperate with and consult with the city or county where a grant is proposed or an interest in real property is proposed to be acquired; and shall, as necessary or appropriate, coordinate its efforts with other state agencies, in cooperation with the Secretary of the Resources Agency. The conservancy shall, as necessary and appropriate, cooperate and consult with a public water system that owns or operates facilities, including lands appurtenant thereto, where a grant is proposed or an interest in land is proposed to be acquired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33343.

(a) The conservancy may make grants or loans to public agencies, nonprofit organizations, and tribal organizations in order to carry out the purposes of this division, including grants or loans provided to acquire an interest in real property, including a fee interest in that property. Grant or loan funds shall be disbursed to a recipient entity only after the entity has entered into an agreement with the conservancy, on the terms and conditions specified by the conservancy. After approving a grant, the conservancy may assist the grantee in carrying out the purposes of the grant.

(b) When awarding grants or making loans pursuant to this division, the conservancy may require repayment of those funds on the terms and conditions it deems appropriate. Proceeds from the repayment or reimbursement of amounts granted or loaned by the conservancy shall be deposited in the fund.

(c) An entity applying for a grant from the conservancy to acquire an interest in real property shall specify all of the following in the grant application:

(1) The intended use of the property.

(2) The manner in which the land will be managed.

(3) How the cost of ongoing management will be funded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33344.

In the case of a grant of funds to a nonprofit organization or tribal organization to acquire an interest in real property, including, but not limited to, a fee interest, the agreement between the conservancy and the recipient nonprofit organization shall require all of the following:

(a) The purchase price of an interest in real property acquired by the nonprofit organization shall not exceed fair market value as established by an appraisal approved by the conservancy.

(b) The terms under which the interest in real property is acquired shall be subject to the conservancy’s approval.

(c) An interest in real property to be acquired under the grant shall not be used as security for a debt unless the conservancy approves the transaction.

(d) The transfer of an interest in the real property shall be subject to approval of the conservancy, and a new agreement sufficient to protect the public interest shall be entered into between the conservancy and the transferee.

(e) A deed or instrument by which the nonprofit organization acquires an interest in real property under the grant shall include a power of termination on the part of the state, subject to the requirements of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 885.010) of Title 5 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Civil Code. The deed or instrument shall provide that the state may exercise the power of termination by notice in the event of the nonprofit organization’s violation of the purpose of the grant through breach of a material term or condition thereof, and that, upon recordation of the notice, full title to the interest in real property identified in the notice shall immediately vest in the state, or in another public agency or a nonprofit organization designated by the conservancy to which the state conveys or has conveyed its interest.

(f) A deed or instrument by which the nonprofit organization acquires an interest in real property under the grant shall provide that the conveyance is subject to a remainder interest vested in the state. If the existence of the nonprofit organization is terminated for any reason, the conservancy may require that the remainder shall become a present interest and that full title to the real property shall vest in the state, or in another public agency or a nonprofit organization designated by the conservancy to which the state conveys or has conveyed its interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33345.

The conservancy shall adopt guidelines setting priorities and criteria for projects and programs, based upon its assessment of program requirements, institutional capabilities, and funding needs throughout the region, and federal, state, and local plans, including general plans, recreation plans, urban water management plans, and groundwater management plans. As part of the process of developing guidelines for projects and programs, the conservancy shall undertake and facilitate a strategic program planning process involving meetings and workshops within each of the subregions, with the purpose of formulating strategic program objectives and priorities within that subregion. The strategic program shall be updated regularly, at least once every five years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

33345.1.

(a) The Sierra Nevada Watershed Improvement Program is hereby established, to be administered by the conservancy, to protect, conserve, and restore the health and resilience of the watersheds and communities of the region, in support of the purposes and programs described in Section 33301. In implementing this program, the conservancy shall coordinate and collaborate with other state agencies, federal agencies, and local entities and stakeholders.

(b) In implementing the program, notwithstanding Section 33341, the conservancy may test new funding, policy, planning, and implementation approaches with the area covered by an